Massachusetts, session 194th, H5304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the executive director of the
Massachusetts Water Resources Authority, may release by deed or other instrument for the
benefit of Nora, LLC, owner of the premises located at 49 Charles Park road in the West
Roxbury section of the city of Boston, its successors or assigns, a portion of a sewer easement
located on said real property. The easement was taken by the office of metropolitan sewage
commissioners for the purpose of constructing, operating, maintaining, repairing and renewing
sewers, drains, manholes and underground appurtenances, recorded with the Suffolk county
registry of deeds in book 2448, page 006 and dated June 5, 1897. The portion of the easement to
of 3

be released is shown on a sketch entitled, “Attachment A Proposed Surplus Sewer Easement 49
Charles Park Road, Boston” dated August 24, 2023, which is on file with the Massachusetts
Water Resources Authority and the division of capital asset management and maintenance. The
exact boundaries of the portion of the easement to be released shall be determined by the
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
Massachusetts Water Resources Authority, based upon a survey.
(b) The release of the portion of the easement authorized in subsection (a) shall be in
accordance with such terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, in consultation with the executive director of the Massachusetts Water Resources
Authority, shall prescribe.
SECTION 2. (a) The consideration for the release of the portion of the easement
authorized in section 1 shall be the full and fair market value of the portion of the easement as
determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance based on an
independent professional appraisal. The commissioner shall submit the appraisal to the inspector
general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review such appraisal including,
but not limited to, an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector
general shall prepare a report of such review and file the report with the commissioner. The
commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal and the inspector general's report and approval
and comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on state administration and regulatory oversight prior to the execution of documents
affecting the release of the portion of the easement authorized in section 1.
of 3

(b) Nora, LLC, its successors or assigns shall be responsible for any costs for surveys,
appraisals, recording fees and other expenses, as determined by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance relating to the release of the portion of the easement authorized in
section 1.
of 3